Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-3406
Report.

On or before July 31 of each year, the department shall provide an annual report to the Governor and the Business and Labor Committee of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The report shall detail the process and results of the labor availability and skills gap studies.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 11.